California statutes. Insurance Code
If after examination of a title insurer, an underwritten title company, or a controlled escrow company, or upon the basis of other information, or upon sufficient complaint as provided in Section 12414.13, the commissioner has good cause to believe that such person or entity, or any rate, rating plan or rating system made or used by any such person or entity does not comply with the requirements and standards of Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401) he shall, unless he has good cause to believe such noncompliance is willful, give notice in writing stating therein in what manner and to what extent such noncompliance is alleged to exist and specifying therein a
 reasonable time, not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days thereafter, in which such noncompliance may be corrected. Notices under this section shall be confidential as between the commissioner and the parties unless a hearing is held under Section 12414.15.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.15.

If the commissioner has good cause to believe such noncompliance to be willful, or if within the period prescribed by the commissioner in the notice required by Section 12414.14 the title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company does not make such changes as may be necessary to correct the noncompliance specified by the commissioner or establish to the satisfaction of the commissioner that such specified noncompliance does not exist, then the commissioner may hold a public hearing in connection therewith, provided that within a reasonable period of time, which shall be not less than 10 days before the date of such hearing, he shall mail written
 notice specifying the matters to be considered at such hearing to such title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company. Such notice shall conform to the requirements for an accusation as prescribed by Section 11503 of the Government Code. If no notice has been given as provided in Section 12414.14, such notice shall state therein in what manner and to what extent noncompliance is alleged to exist. The hearing shall not include any additional subjects not specified in the notices required by Section 12414.14 or this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.16.

If after a hearing pursuant to Section 12414.15 the commissioner finds:

(a) That any rate, rating plan or rating system violates the provisions of Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401), he may issue an order to the person or entity which has been the subject of the hearing specifying in what respects such violation exists and stating when, within a reasonable period of time, the further use of such rate or rating system by such person or entity in the business of title insurance made thereafter shall be prohibited.

(b) That the violation
 which has been the subject of hearing was willful, he may suspend or revoke, in whole or in part, the certificate of authority of such title insurer or the license of such underwritten title company or controlled escrow company with respect to the transaction of the business of title insurance which has been the subject matter of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.17.

In addition to other penalties provided in this code, the commissioner may suspend or revoke, in whole or in part, the authority of any person or entity to engage in the business of title insurance upon the failure of any such person or entity to comply within the time limited by such order or any extension thereof which the commissioner may grant, with an order of the commissioner lawfully made by him pursuant to Section 12414.16 and effective pursuant to Section 12414.19.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.18.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all proceedings in connection with the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license or certificate of authority under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted to him therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.19.

Any finding, determination, rule, ruling, or order made by the commissioner under Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401), Article 5.7 (commencing with Section 12402), Article 6.7 (commencing with Section 12414.13), and Article 6.9 (commencing with Section 12414.20) of this chapter shall be subject to review by the courts of the state and proceedings on review shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure. In such proceedings on review, the court is authorized and directed to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence and unless the weight of the evidence supports the findings, determination, rule, ruling, or order of the
 commissioner, the same shall be annulled.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a petition for review of any such finding, determination, rule or order, may be filed at any time before the effective date thereof. No such finding, determination, rule, or order shall become effective before the expiration of 20 days after notice and a copy thereof are mailed or delivered to the person or entity affected, and any finding, determination, rule, or order of the commissioner so submitted for review shall not become effective for a further period of 15 days after the petition for review is filed with the court. The court may stay the effectiveness thereof for a longer period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 436.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.9. Examinations, Penalties and Miscellaneous [12414.20. - 12414.31.]

12414.20.

The commissioner may, as often as may be reasonable and necessary, make or cause to be made an examination of any advisory organization for the business of title insurance in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.21.

The commissioner may, pursuant to reasonable rules and regulations which he shall prescribe, make or cause to be made an examination of every title insurer, underwritten title company or controlled escrow company engaged in the business of title insurance to ascertain whether such person or entity and every rate and rating system used in the business of title insurance complies with the requirements and standards of Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401) of this chapter. Such examination shall not be a part of a periodic general examination participated in by a representative of more than one state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.22.

The officers, managers, agents, and employees of any advisory organization, title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company may be examined at any time under oath and shall exhibit all books, records, accounts, documents, or agreements governing their method of operation, together with all data, statistics, and information of every kind and character collected or considered by such persons or entities in the conduct of the operations to which such examination relates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.23.

The reasonable cost of any examination authorized by this article shall be paid by the advisory organization, title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company to be examined. A copy of any written report which is prepared as a result of a full balance sheet financial examination conducted pursuant to Section 12389, shall be provided to the entity examined within 30 days following the production of the report.

In the event any examination or review of financial statements has resulted in a requirement of, or directive to, the entity to make changes in its conduct or the business of title
 insurance, those requirements or directives shall be in writing, and provided to the entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 370, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.24.

No person, title insurer, underwritten title company, controlled escrow company, or advisory organization shall willfully withhold information from, or knowingly give false or misleading information to, the commissioner or to any advisory organization which will affect rates for the business of title insurance to which the provisions of this chapter are applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.25.

(a) Any person, title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company who fails to comply with a final order of the commissioner under this chapter shall be liable to the state in an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), but if that failure is willful he, she, or it shall be liable to the state in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) for that failure. The commissioner shall collect the amount so payable and may bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enforce collection. Those penalties may be in addition to any other penalties provided by law.

(b) (1) A willful violation of the provisions of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(2) This subdivision is not applicable to Section 12389.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 27.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.26.

No act done, action taken, or agreement made pursuant to the authority conferred by Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401) or Article 5.7 (commencing with Section 12402) of this chapter shall constitute a violation of or grounds for prosecution or civil proceedings under any other law of this state heretofore or hereafter enacted which does not specifically refer to insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.27.

Commencing 120 days following January 1, 1974, no title insurer, underwritten title company or controlled escrow company shall charge for any title policy or service in connection with the business of title insurance, except in accordance with rate filings which have become effective pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401) of this chapter or as otherwise authorized by such article; provided, however, where a rate is on file with the commissioner and in effect immediately prior to such date, such rate shall continue in effect until a new rate filing is thereafter made and becomes effective in the manner provided in Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401)
 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.28.

All title policies issued by title insurers shall be subscribed by the president or a vice president and by the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation. All such title policies are as binding and obligatory upon the corporation as if executed over the corporate seal. The signatures of such officers, or any one of them, may be in their own handwriting or engraved, lithographed, printed, stamped, or otherwise affixed to such title policies. Any title policy so signed shall be presumed to be duly subscribed, and if the title policy provides for an additional signature and such signature appears thereon a like presumption shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.29.

The administration and enforcement of Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401) and Article 5.7 (commencing with Section 12402) of this chapter shall be governed solely by the provisions of this chapter. Except as provided in this chapter, no other law relating to insurance and no other provisions in this code heretofore or hereafter enacted shall apply to or be construed as supplementing or modifying the provisions of such articles unless such other law or other provision expressly so provides and specifically refers to the sections of such articles which it intends to supplement or modify. The provisions of this chapter and regulations adopted
 pursuant thereto shall constitute the exclusive regulation of the conduct of escrow and title transactions by entities engaged in the business of title insurance as defined in Section 12340.3, notwithstanding any local regulation or ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 479, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.30.

(a) When constituting an offer to issue an owner’s policy of title insurance, a preliminary report shall incorporate the following statement, in bold print on front of the preliminary report: 

“Please read the exceptions shown or referred to below and the exceptions and exclusions set forth in Exhibit A of this report carefully. The exceptions and exclusions are meant to provide you with notice of matters which are not covered under the terms of the title insurance policy and should be
 carefully considered.

It is important to note that this preliminary report is not a written representation as to the condition of title and may not list all liens, defects, and encumbrances affecting title to the land.” 

(b) Upon request, a title insurance company may provide coverage against loss or damage under the terms, conditions, and stipulations of the title insurance policy for any monetary lien set forth in the preliminary report.

(c) This section does not modify any of the provisions of Section 12340.11.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1125, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.31.

(a) (1) Whenever the commissioner takes any formal enforcement or disciplinary action directly against an employee of a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company, for malfeasance or misconduct committed by the employee in their performance of escrow-related services, upon the action becoming final the commissioner shall notify the Real Estate Commissioner and the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation of the action or actions taken. The purpose of this notification is to alert the departments that enforcement or disciplinary action has been taken, if the employee seeks or obtains employment with entities regulated by the departments.

(2) The commissioner shall provide the Real Estate Commissioner
 and the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, in addition to the notification of the action taken, with a copy of the written accusation, statement of issues, or order issued or filed in the matter and, at the request of the Real Estate Commissioner or Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, with any underlying factual material relevant to the enforcement or disciplinary action. Any confidential information provided by the commissioner to the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Real Estate Commissioner shall not be made public pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding any other law, the disclosure of any underlying factual material to the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Real Estate Commissioner shall not operate as a waiver of confidentiality or any privilege that the commissioner may assert.

(b) The commissioner shall establish and maintain, on the internet website
 maintained by the Department of Insurance, a separate and readily identifiable database of all persons who have been subject to any enforcement or disciplinary action that triggers the notification requirements of this section. The database shall also contain a direct link to the databases, described in Section 10176.1 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 17423.1 of the Financial Code and required to be maintained on the internet websites of the Bureau of Real Estate and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, respectively, of persons who have been subject to enforcement or disciplinary action for malfeasance or misconduct related to the escrow industry by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Real Estate Commissioner.

(c) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the State of California, the Department of Insurance, the Insurance
 Commissioner, any other state agency, or any officer, agent, employee, consultant, or contractor of the state, for the release of any false or unauthorized information pursuant to this section, unless the release of that information was done with knowledge and malice, or for the failure to release any information pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 198.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Annual Renewal Fees [12415. - 12417.]

12415.

It is the intent of the Legislature that certificated title insurers and licensed underwritten title companies, as defined in Section 12340.5 shall pay to the commissioner an annual renewal fee, as provided in Section 12416, in addition to that provided as to title insurers by Section 705 to cover the costs to the commissioner for administering and enforcing Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 12389), Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401), and Article 6 (commencing with Section 12404) of Chapter 1, Part 6, Division 2 of this code and other provisions of this code as may be subsequently incorporated by reference in this article by legislative enactment. Such fee shall
 be in lieu of all fees provided for in Article 6 (commencing with Section 12404) of Chapter 1, Part 6, Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12416.

Each certificated title insurer possessing a certificate of authority of indefinite term pursuant to Section 701 shall owe and pay an annual renewal fee of nine hundred eighty-eight dollars ($988). Each underwritten title company possessing a license of indefinite term pursuant to Section 12389 shall owe and pay an annual renewal fee of five hundred sixty-seven dollars ($567), except that: (a) when the aggregate number of documents recorded and documents filed in the offices of the county recorders in the preceding calendar year in all counties where the company is licensed to transact business is less than 50,000, that company shall owe and pay an annual renewal fee of two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283), or (b) when the aggregate number of documents recorded and documents filed in the offices of the
 county recorders in the preceding calendar year in all counties where the company is licensed to transact business is more than 50,000 but less than 100,000, that company shall owe and pay an annual renewal fee of three hundred sixty dollars ($360). Those fees shall be for annual periods commencing on July 1 of each year and ending on June 30 of each year, and shall be due on March 1 preceding the annual period for which those fees are charged, and shall be delinquent on and after April 1 next following the date when due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 80.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12417.

The annual renewal fee provided by this article is not a tax but a charge for services to be rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1415.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Title Insurance Representatives [12418. - 12418.4.]

12418.

(a) No person shall be employed as a title marketing representative in this state unless the person holds a valid “certificate of registration” as a title marketing representative issued by the commissioner pursuant to Section 12418.1.

(b) For purposes of this article, “title marketing representative” means a natural person employed by a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company whose primary duty is to market, offer, solicit, negotiate, or sell
 title insurance, as defined in Section 12340.1. A title marketing representative does not include a person whose primary duties directly involve the creation, production, or issuance of the title policy or the performance of escrow services.

(c) If any person knowingly markets title insurance without having applied for or obtained a certificate of registration pursuant to Section 12418.1, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to Section 12921.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12418.1.

(a) A certificate of registration as a title marketing representative shall be applied for and renewed by filing with the commissioner a written application. The application shall be on a form prescribed by the commissioner, and shall prescribe the disclosure of information that will aid the commissioner in determining whether the prerequisites for the certificate have been met. The applicant shall certify that the contents of the application are true and correct under penalty of perjury.

(b) Each application for a certificate of registration shall contain the following information:

(1) The residence address, the principal business address, and the mailing
 address of the applicant.

(2) A statement, signed by an officer of the business by whom the applicant is or will be employed, certifying that the applicant will be provided training regarding Article 6 (commencing with Section 12404) within 60 days of the hiring date or date of application.

(3) A statement, signed by the applicant, as to whether he or she has previously had a certificate of registration revoked, suspended, or otherwise limited under Section 12418.4.

(c) Each application to obtain or renew a certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a filing fee in an amount determined by the department to be sufficient to defray the department’s actual costs of processing the application, not to exceed two hundred thirty-seven dollars ($237). An application shall not be deemed filed unless it has been
 delivered to the department accompanied by the proper filing fee.

(d) The commissioner may decline to act on an incomplete or defective application until an amended application that completes the prescribed form has been filed with the department. In the event that the application is found to be defective or incomplete, the department shall notify the applicant and his or her employer in writing that the application needs to be modified and resubmitted within 15 days of receipt of this written notification.

(e) An applicant submitting an application filed with the department for a certificate of registration as a title marketing representative may solicit, sell, or market title insurance, as defined in Section 12340.1, in the interim time period preceding the formal approval or rejection of the application, but shall be subject to the same compliance requirements as a holder of an
 approved certificate of registration. An applicant with a pending application shall be deemed to be operating on a provisional basis.

(f) In the event that the title marketing representative’s employment with a title company is terminated, the title company formerly employing the title marketing representative shall notify the department within 30 days of the termination. If the title marketing representative becomes employed by another title company as a title marketing representative, the new employer shall notify the department of the title marketing representative’s new employment within 30 days of the commencement of that employment.

(g) An applicant who has previously had a certificate of registration revoked, suspended, or otherwise limited under subdivision (d) of Section 12418.4 may not sell, solicit, or market title insurance during the interim period described in
 subdivision (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 81.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12418.2.

(a) An applicant or holder of a certificate of registration as a title marketing representative is not required to pass a qualifying examination, and is exempt from prelicensing and continuing education requirements, except as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12418.1.

(b) Upon the filing of an application for the issuance or renewal of a certificate of registration, the commissioner may conduct an investigation, during the interim period set forth in
 subdivision (e) of Section 12418.1, to determine if the applicant shall be granted the certificate of registration by virtue of prior conduct in the marketing of policies of title insurance and to verify the accuracy of the information submitted by the applicant to the department and may require the filing of any supplementary documents, affidavits, and statements that may be necessary to determine whether training specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12418.1 has been, or will be, provided to the applicant within the time period set forth in Section 12418.1. Should the commissioner decline to approve the granting of a certificate of registration, the procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 12418.4 shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12418.3.

(a) Each certificate of registration issued under this article shall be for a three-year period beginning on the date the certificate is issued.

(b) Not less than 60 days before a certificate of registration will expire, the commissioner may mail or use an electronic delivery method, including email or other similar electronic method, to deliver an application to renew the certificate to the latest email or mailing address appearing on the registrant’s records. It shall be the responsibility of the registrant to renew his or her certificate, whether or not a renewal notice is received.

(c) The application for renewal of an expired certificate of registration may be filed after the expiration date and
 until the same month and day of the next succeeding year. In addition to the fee for a renewal application, a delinquent application fee in the amount of fifty-eight dollars ($58) shall be assessed for each application for renewal filed after the expiration date. Each registrant shall be subject to payment of delinquent application fees under this subdivision. The commissioner may waive the delinquent application fee, or accept a renewal filed after the date specified in this subdivision, if the registrant’s failure to comply is due to clerical or other inadvertent error on the part of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 82.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12418.4.

(a) Sections 1667, 1668, 1669, 1670, 1729, 1729.2, 1738, 1738.5, 1742, 1743, and Article 6 (commencing with Section 12404), shall apply to all applicants or holders of a certificate of registration issued pursuant to this article.

(b) The department may revoke, suspend, restrict, or decline to issue a certificate of registration if it determines that the title marketing representative or applicant has violated provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 12404) pursuant to the due process and hearing requirements set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) Except as provided in Section 1669, a certificate of registration shall not
 be denied, restricted, suspended, or revoked without a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) In addition to, or in lieu of, any other penalty that may be imposed under this article against a title marketing representative, the commissioner may bring an administrative action against a title marketing representative for any violation of the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 12404). If a title marketing representative charged with a violation of Article 6 (commencing with Section 12404) is determined by the commissioner to have committed the violation, the commissioner may require the surrender of, temporarily suspend or revoke either permanently or temporarily the title marketing representative’s certificate of registration,
 and, in addition, may impose a monetary penalty. Any payment of a monetary penalty pursuant to a settlement or final adjudication shall be made from the title marketing representative’s personal funds and not by their employer either directly or through the title marketing representative. This article shall not preclude an action against a company that had actual knowledge of the violation by the title marketing representative. A title marketing representative who is issued a certificate of registration under this article may not engage in any activity that is otherwise prohibited through a separate entity controlled by the title marketing representative or by the company or entity that employs the title marketing representative.

(e) A title marketing representative who has their certificate of registration revoked by the department shall
 not be permitted to reapply for another certificate of registration with the department for five years from the date of revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 444, Sec. 7.   (SB 577)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2A. Mortgage Guaranty Insurance [12640.01. - 12640.20.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [12640.01. - 12640.02.]

12640.01.

This chapter may be cited as the Mortgage Guaranty Insurance Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.02.

The definitions set forth in this article shall govern the construction of the terms used in this chapter but shall not affect any other provisions of this code.

(a) “Mortgage guaranty insurance” means:

(1) Insurance against financial loss by reason of nonpayment of principal, interest, and other sums agreed to be paid under the terms of any note or bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument constituting a first lien or charge on real estate, provided the improvement on the real estate is a residential building or a condominium unit or buildings designed for occupancy by not more than four families.

(2) Insurance against financial loss by reason of nonpayment of principal, interest, and other sums agreed to be paid under the terms of any note or bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument constituting a junior lien or charge on real estate, provided the improvement on the real estate is a residential building or a condominium unit or building designed for occupancy by not more than four families.

(3) Insurance against financial loss by reason of nonpayment of principal, interest, and other sums agreed to be paid under the terms of any note or bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument constituting a lien or charge on real estate, provided the improvement on the real estate is a building or buildings designed for occupancy by five or more families or designed to be occupied for industrial or commercial purposes.

(4) Insurance against financial loss by reason of nonpayment of rent and other sums agreed to be paid under the terms of a written lease for the possession, use, or occupancy of real estate, provided the improvement on the real estate is a building or buildings designed to be occupied for industrial or commercial purposes.

(b) (1) “Authorized real estate security” for the purposes of this chapter means either (A) real estate, plus the balance of any pledged cash account, pledged borrower retirement account, or collateralized guaranty agreement contracted for by parents, blood relatives, employers, or nonprofit corporations for the benefit of the borrower; or (B) real estate securing a note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness by a junior mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument constituting a junior lien or charge on the real estate, which, when combined with all existing mortgage loan amounts, does not exceed a total indebtedness equal to 103 percent of the fair market value of the real estate at the time the junior loan is made, provided that, in determining the foregoing 103-percent limitation, if the loan securing the junior lien is an equity line of credit loan, the full amount of the line of credit to be secured by the junior lien shall be considered the amount of the loan, and further provided, in all cases that both of the following are true:

(i) The real estate loan secured in this manner is any type of loan that a bank, savings association, mortgage banker, credit union, mortgage loan broker, or insurance company, which is supervised and regulated by a department of this state or an agency of the federal government, is authorized to make or arrange, or would be authorized to make or arrange, disregarding any requirement applicable to an institution that the amount of the loan not exceed a certain percentage of the value of the real estate.

(ii) The improvement on the real estate is a building or buildings designed for occupancy as specified by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) The lien on the real estate may be subject and subordinate to the following:

(A) The lien of any public bond, assessment, or tax, when no installment, call, or payment of or under the bond, assessment, or tax is delinquent.

(B) Outstanding mineral, oil or timber rights, rights-of-way, easements or rights-of-way or support, sewer rights, building restrictions or other restrictions or covenants, conditions or regulations of use, or outstanding leases upon the real property under which rents or profits are reserved to the owner thereof.

(3) “Authorized real estate security” also means a stock or membership certificate issued to a tenant-stockholder or resident-member by a completed fee simple cooperative housing corporation, as defined in Section 17265 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Section 216 of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

(c) “Contingency reserve” means an additional premium reserve established for the protection of policyholders against the effect of adverse economic cycles.

(d) “Policyholders surplus” means the aggregate of capital, surplus, and contingency reserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 473.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Capital, Surplus and Contingency Reserve Requirements [12640.03. - 12640.06.]

12640.03.

An insurer shall not transact the business of mortgage guaranty insurance unless it has paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) and paid-in surplus of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.04.

(a) In addition to the paid-in capital and surplus provided in Section 12640.03, each mortgage guaranty insurer shall establish a contingency reserve after establishment of the unearned premium reserve. There shall be an annual calculation of and contribution to the contingency reserve. The aggregate annual contribution shall be the greater of either 50 percent of the net earned premium or the policyholders surplus required to be established under Section 12640.05 divided by 10. There shall be provisional contributions, made on a quarterly
 basis, equal to 50 percent of the net earned premium for the preceding quarter.

(b) The contributions to the contingency reserve made during each calendar year shall be maintained for a period of 120 months. That portion of the contingency reserve established and maintained for more than 120 months shall be released and shall no longer constitute part of the contingency reserve.

(c) With the approval of the commissioner, withdrawals may be made from the contingency reserve when incurred losses exceed 35 percent of the total year-to-date net earned premium. Provisional withdrawals may be made on a quarterly basis from the contingency reserve in an amount not to exceed 75 percent of the withdrawal calculated in accordance with this subdivision.

(d) With the approval of the commissioner, a mortgage guaranty insurer may
 withdraw from the contingency reserve any amounts which are in excess of the policyholders surplus required to be established under Section 12640.05 as indicated on the most recent annual statement filed pursuant to Section 923. In reviewing a request for withdrawal, the commissioner may consider those records that may be necessary to evaluate the request, including, but not limited to, records relating to loss development and trends. If any portion of the contingency reserve for which withdrawal is requested is maintained by a reinsurer, the commissioner may also consider the financial condition of the reinsurer. If any portion of the contingency reserve for which withdrawal is requested is maintained in a segregated account or segregated trust and withdrawal would result in funds being removed from the segregated account or segregated trust, the commissioner may also consider the financial condition of the reinsurer.

(e) Releases and
 withdrawals from the contingency reserve shall be accounted for on a first-in-first-out basis.

(f) The calculations to develop the contingency reserve shall be made in the following sequence:

(1) The additions required by subdivision (a).

(2) The releases required by subdivision (b).

(3) The withdrawals permitted by subdivision (c).

(4) The withdrawals permitted by subdivision (d).

(g) The commissioner’s review of a request for withdrawal under subdivision (d) shall be conducted pursuant to his or her examination authority under Section 730 and at the expense of the insurer pursuant to Section 736. The commissioner shall make
 a finding, set forth within the documents approving any withdrawal, that the withdrawal, and any reduction in total assets that may follow the withdrawal of which the commissioner is aware at the time of his or her approval, will not reduce the cash or securities of the insurer in a manner that will materially, adversely impair the ability of the insurer to maintain its credit rating or meet future obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.05.

(a) A mortgage guaranty insurer shall maintain a policyholders surplus in an amount not less than the amount required by this section. The policyholders surplus shall be the calculated net of reinsurance ceded, but shall include reinsurance assumed. “Face amount of an insured mortgage” means the outstanding principal balance computed without any reduction because of an insurer’s option limiting its
 coverage, but shall exclude the outstanding principal balance of any loan that is in default and for which the insurer has established a loss reserve, provided that the loss reserve established for that loan is equal to or greater than the policyholders surplus the insurer would otherwise be required to establish with respect to that loan, pursuant to this section. Nothing in this subdivision limits the commissioner’s authority under Section 12640.04.
